Hawaii, session 2026, SB964.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF HAWAII: SECTION 1.  The legislature finds that using waste‑to‑energy technology is a promising strategy for reducing the State's solid waste stream.  Waste-to-energy facilities divert waste from landfills while extracting energy and valuable materials for recycling.  Nationally, there are seventy-six waste-to-energy facilities that process up to ninety-four thousand tons of solid waste per day.  This produces enough energy each day to power the equivalent of 2,300,000 homes.  The legislature believes that a waste-to-energy facility would help the State meet its goal of reducing the solid waste stream while developing sustainable energy sources. Accordingly, the purpose of this Act is to authorize the Hawaii state energy office to establish a public-private partnership to develop a waste-to-energy generating facility in each county having a population below eight hundred thousand. SECTION 2.  Section 196-71, Hawaii Revised Statutes, is amended by amending subsection (b) to read as follows: "(b)  The Hawaii state energy office [shall]: (1)  [Provide] Shall provide analysis and planning to actively develop and inform policies to achieve energy efficiency, renewable energy, energy resiliency, and clean transportation goals with the legislature, public utilities commission, state agencies, and other relevant stakeholders; (2)  [Lead] Shall lead efforts to incorporate energy efficiency, renewable energy, energy resiliency, and clean transportation to reduce costs and achieve clean energy goals across all public facilities; (3)  [Provide] Shall provide renewable energy, energy efficiency, energy resiliency, and clean transportation project deployment facilitation to assist private sector project completion when aligned with state energy goals; [and] (4)  [Engage] Shall engage the private sector to help lead efforts to achieve renewable energy and clean transportation goals through the Hawaii clean energy initiative[.]; and (5)  May establish a public-private partnership to develop a waste-to-energy generating facility in each county having a population below eight hundred thousand." SECTION 3. Statutory material to be repealed is bracketed and stricken.  New statutory material is underscored. SECTION 4. This Act shall take effect upon its approval.